Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 9

General Obligation Refunding Bonds

9-21-901. Authorization to issue general obligation refunding bonds.

Any local government has the power and is authorized to issue, by resolution, general obligation refunding bonds to refund outstanding obligations heretofore or hereafter lawfully issued or assumed by the local government, and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof and to secure such bonds as provided in this part and part 1 of this chapter.

General obligation refunding bonds issued hereunder and secured by the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the local government shall be for the purpose of:

Refunding outstanding obligations which are secured by a pledge of the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the local government;

Refunding outstanding obligations secured by a pledge of revenues in addition to the full faith and credit pledge; or

Refunding outstanding obligations secured solely by the revenues of a public works project.

General obligation refunding bonds may be issued to refinance more than one (1) issue of outstanding obligations, notwithstanding that such obligations may have been issued at different times.

The resolution authorizing general obligation refunding bonds may also provide for other bonds to be issued jointly with such refunding bonds.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-1.

9-21-902. Determination by governing body to be conclusive.

A determination by the governing body that any refunding is advantageous or necessary to the local government, or that any of the amounts provided in §9-21-904 should be included in such refunding, or that any of the outstanding obligations should be called for redemption on the first or any subsequent available redemption date or permitted to remain outstanding until their respective dates of maturity, shall be conclusive. However, the determination as to whether the general obligation refunding bonds can be sold at a private negotiated sale is subject to §9-21-910(c).

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-2.

9-21-903. Plan of refunding to be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee — Publication of notice of refunding.

Prior to the adoption by the governing body of the resolution authorizing the issuance of general obligation refunding bonds, a plan of refunding shall be submitted for review to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, who shall immediately acknowledge receipt in writing of the proposed plan of refunding. If the sole purpose of the plan of refunding is to provide cost savings to the public, a computation of projected cost savings shall also be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee as a part of the plan of refunding. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may report thereon to the governing body within fifteen (15) days after receipt of the plan. After receiving a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee on the plan of refunding or after the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the date the plan of refunding is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, whichever date is earlier, the governing body may take such action with reference to the proposed plan of refunding as it deems advisable in accordance with this part.

If the sole purpose of the plan of refunding is to provide cost savings to the public and if the state funding board has established guidelines with respect to such cost savings, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall determine whether the plan of refunding substantially complies with the guidelines, and shall so state in the report on the plan of refunding. After receiving a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee stating that the plan of refunding complies substantially with such guidelines or after the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the date the plan of refunding is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, whichever date is earlier, the governing body may take such action with reference to the proposed plan of refunding as it deems advisable in accordance with this part.

If a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee states that the plan of refunding does not substantially comply with the guidelines, if any, a notice in substantially the following form shall be published prior to the sale of such bonds once in a newspaper having general circulation in the local government:

NOTICE

The following report has been received from the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee:

(full text of report)

Unless within ten (10) days from the date of publication hereof a petition signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the registered voters of the local government (or the portion thereof being taxed for the bonds) shall have been filed with the (official charged with maintaining the records of the issuer) protesting the issuance of the general obligation refunding bonds, such general obligation refunding bonds may be issued as the governing body deems advisable.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-3; 2010, ch. 868, § 64.

9-21-904. Maximum amount of principal for which general obligation refunding bonds may be issued.

The principal amount of any issue of general obligation refunding bonds shall not exceed the sum of the following:

The principal amount of the outstanding obligations to be refunded; provided, that general obligation refunding bonds may be issued in such amounts to permit any part of the bonds to reflect a zero (0) rate of interest on an original issue discount;

The redemption premium, if any, thereon;

The interest due and payable on such outstanding obligations to and including the first or any subsequent available redemption date or dates selected, in its discretion, by the governing body, or to the date or dates of maturity, whichever shall be determined by the governing body to be most advantageous or necessary to the local government; and

Any expenses of the issuance and sale of such general obligation refunding bonds, including bond discount, credit enhancement, engraving, printing, and advertising fees, the creation of initial debt service reserve funds, and reasonable and necessary fees of financial and legal advisors deemed by the governing body to be necessary for the issuance of the general obligation refunding bonds.

Any money in a sinking or reserve fund or other fund for the obligations to be refunded may be used for the purposes stated in subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) or may be deposited in a sinking fund or reserve fund or other fund for the refunding bonds.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-4; 1987, ch. 77, § 13.

9-21-905. Initial resolution and election requirements — When required.

If the general obligation refunding bonds shall be payable from ad valorem taxes without limitation of rate or amount and the outstanding obligations to be refunded are secured solely by the revenues of a public works project, then an initial resolution authorizing general obligation refunding bonds shall be adopted in conformance with §9-21-205 and shall conform to §9-21-206 requiring publication of the resolution and the notice therein required. Sections9-21-207 and9-21-209 —9-21-212, governing election requirements and procedures, and §9-21-215, governing the adoption of a tax resolution by the governing body of the local government, shall also apply. If the refunding bonds will be secured in the same manner as the bonds being refunded, an initial resolution need not be adopted.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-5; 1987, ch. 77, § 14.

9-21-906. Sale of general obligation refunding bonds at below par value.

All general obligation refunding bonds issued by any local government under the authority of this part and part 1 of this chapter shall be sold for not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par value and accrued interest as the governing body of the local government may direct. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the sale of particular bonds constituting a part of a single issue or series of bonds at a price below that herein specified, as long as the total price paid by the purchaser for the entire issue or series of bonds offered for sale on any given date shall be not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of the par value of the entire issue or series of bonds and accrued interest; provided, that if any part of such issue or series of such general obligation refunding bonds are to be sold at a zero (0) rate of interest or at an original issue discount, such bonds may be sold at not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of the original reoffering price of such discount bonds and accrued interest.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-6.

9-21-907. Terms of general obligation refunding bonds.

The general obligation refunding bonds may be sold in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, may bear interest at a zero (0) rate or at such other rate or rates (which may vary from time to time), may be payable at such time or times, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may carry such registration and conversion privileges, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, may be subject to such terms of redemption with or without a premium, and may provide for the replacement of mutilated, destroyed, stolen, or lost bonds, all as may be provided by resolution of the governing body.

A general obligation refunding bond issue may be delivered as an installment bond payable as to principal and interest in equal or approximately equal installments for the term of the installment bond issue in accordance with the resolution authorizing the bond issue. The authorizing resolution shall stipulate the annual principal and interest requirements during the full term of the bond issue.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of general obligation refunding bonds issued or anticipated to be issued hereunder, at any time during the term of the general obligation refunding bonds, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized herein are in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board, as set forth in § 9-21-130, a local government by resolution may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the governing body of the local government may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the local government to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-7; 1999, ch. 432, § 7; 2001, ch. 253, § 10.

9-21-908. Limitation on maturity of bonds to be refunded.

Unless the outstanding obligations are retired at the time of delivery of the general obligation refunding bonds, then the general obligation refunding bonds shall not be issued to refund the outstanding obligations unless the outstanding obligations shall mature by their terms, or shall be subject to redemption and be called for redemption within ten (10) years from the date of delivery of the general obligation refunding bonds. However, this time limitation shall not apply if the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee approves a greater period in the comptroller of the treasury's or the comptroller's designee's report on the proposed refunding plan.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-8; 2010, ch. 868, § 65.

9-21-909. Installment sales and exchanges.

General obligation refunding bonds may be sold or exchanged in installments at different times or an entire issue or series may be sold or exchanged at one (1) time. Any issue or series of general obligation refunding bonds may be exchanged in part or sold in part in installments at different times or at one (1) time. The general obligation refunding bonds may be sold or exchanged at any time on, before, or after the maturity of any of the outstanding obligations to be refunded.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-9.

9-21-910. Sale of general obligation refunding bonds — Notices — Agreement to sell.

Any local government of this state proposing to sell general obligation refunding bonds for any authorized purpose under this part and part 1 of this chapter is authorized to sell such bonds either at a competitive public sale or at a private negotiated sale as the governing body of the local government may direct. However, if the general obligation refunding bonds are to be sold at a private negotiated sale, then approval must first be obtained from the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee in accordance with subsection (c).

If the general obligation refunding bonds will be sold at a competitive public sale, the local government shall publish a notice of sale at least five (5) days prior to the date on which the general obligation refunding bonds are to be sold, either in a financial newspaper having national circulation, or via an electronic communication system that is generally available to the financial community. The notice of sale shall set forth the time, date and place of sale, the maximum amount of general obligation refunding bonds to be sold, the maximum interest rate, the maximum discount, if any, that will be permitted, in dollars or as a percentage of par value, and the basis upon which the general obligation refunding bonds will be awarded. If the principal amount of general obligation refunding bonds to be sold is not greater than five million dollars ($5,000,000), then the notice of sale may be published either as set forth in this subsection (b), or solely in a newspaper having general circulation in the local government.

If the general obligation refunding bonds, except for bonds sold pursuant to a commitment of a state or federal agency to purchase the same, will be sold at private negotiated sale, then the local government shall first submit to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for approval, a copy of the initial resolution as adopted, if applicable, a copy of the proposed resolution authorizing the general obligation refunding bonds, a copy of the proposed disclosure statement, if any, and a detailed statement showing the estimated cost of issuance which shall include at least the following, if applicable:

Fiscal agent and/or financial advisor fees;

Bond counsel fees;

Other legal charges, if any;

Credit enhancement fees;

Trustee fees;

Registration fees;

Paying agent fees;

Rating agency fees;

Underwriters' discount or charges;

Remarketing agent fees; and

Printing, advertising and other expenses;

together with any other information deemed pertinent to the bond issue by the local government.

Based upon the information submitted and any additional information deemed pertinent by the local government, the local government shall state and demonstrate in its request for approval to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee that the proposed private negotiated sale is feasible, that the proposed private negotiated sale is in the best interests of the local government, and that the local government should be able to amortize the proposed indebtedness together with all other obligations then outstanding. The state funding board may establish guidelines to assist the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee in reviewing applications so submitted by the local government. Such guidelines, if any, will be made available to the local government upon request to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall notify the governing body of the local government of the comptroller of the treasury's or the comptroller's designee's approval or disapproval within fifteen (15) days from the date that all required information is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. If the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee approves a private negotiated sale for the general obligation refunding bonds or if the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee fails to act within such time, then the local government may proceed to sell the general obligation refunding bonds in that manner. If the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee does not approve the proposed negotiated sale, then the local government may proceed to sell the general obligation refunding bonds at a competitive public sale in the manner provided by subsection (b).

The governing body of a local government may enter into an agreement to sell its general obligation refunding bonds under this part providing for delivery of its general obligation refunding bonds on a date greater than ninety (90) days and not greater than the first optional redemption date on which the obligations being refunded can be optionally redeemed resulting in cost savings or at par, whichever is earlier, only upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the agreement or contract of a local government to sell its general obligation refunding bonds as authorized in this subsection (d) is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board in accordance with § 9-21-130. Agreements to sell general obligation refunding bonds for delivery ninety (90) days or less from the date of execution of the agreement to sell the general obligation refunding bonds do not require a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-10; 1987, ch. 77, § 15; 1995, ch. 67, § 2; 1996, ch. 632, § 2; 1999, ch. 432, § 8; 2005, ch. 393, § 10; 2010, ch. 868, § 66.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 67, § 3 provided that the provisions of Acts 1995, ch. 67 apply to tax year 1995.

9-21-911. Sale of general obligation refunding bonds to a state or federal agency.

If any general obligation refunding bonds are to be sold pursuant to a commitment of a state or federal agency to purchase the same, such bonds may be sold at a private negotiated sale to the state or federal agency without the necessity of any public advertisement of the sale or of the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-11; 2005, ch. 393, § 11; 2010, ch. 868, § 67.

9-21-912. Notice of refunding.

If, at the time of delivery of the general obligation refunding bonds, the obligations to be refunded will not be retired or a valid and timely notice of redemption of the outstanding obligations is not given in accordance with the resolution, indenture or other instrument governing the redemption of the outstanding obligations, then, prior to the issuance of the general obligation refunding bonds, the governing body shall cause to be given a notice of its intention to issue the general obligation refunding bonds. The notice shall be given either by mail to the owners of all the outstanding obligations to be refunded at their addresses shown on the bond registration records for the outstanding obligations or given by publication one (1) time each in a newspaper having a general circulation in the local government and in a financial newspaper published in New York, New York, having a national circulation. The notice shall set forth the estimated date of delivery of the general obligation refunding bonds and identify the obligations, or the individual maturities thereof, proposed to be refunded; provided, that if portions of individual maturities are proposed to be refunded, the notice shall identify the maturities subject to partial refunding and the aggregate principal amount to be refunded within each maturity. If the issuance of the general obligation refunding bonds does not occur as provided in the notice, the governing body shall cause notice thereof to be given as provided above. Except as otherwise set forth in this section, the notice required pursuant to this section shall be given whether or not any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-12; 1994, ch. 806, § 7.

9-21-913. Notice of redemption.

If any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption, the governing body shall cause the notice of redemption to be given in the manner and at the time required by the resolution or ordinance authorizing such outstanding obligations.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-13.

9-21-914. Application of proceeds of sale of general obligation refunding bonds.

The principal proceeds from the sale of any general obligation refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows, either to the:

Immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded; or

Extent not required for the immediate payment of the outstanding obligations being refunded, the proceeds of the general obligation refunding bonds shall be deposited in escrow with a bank or trust company either located in this state or regulated by a federal entity to provide for the payment of the outstanding obligations and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with the refunding, and may also be used to pay interest on the general obligation refunding bonds prior to the retirement of the outstanding obligations.

Money in any such escrow fund may be invested in:

Direct obligations of, or obligations, the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by, the United States;

Obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States;

Certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in this state; provided, that such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any of the obligations referred to in subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates of deposit so secured; or

Obligations which are rated in either of the top two (2) highest rated categories by a nationally recognized rating agency of such obligations and whose interest income is exempt from tax by the United States, which are direct general obligations of the state or a political subdivision thereof or obligations guaranteed by the state, to the payment of the principal of and interest on which the full faith and credit of the state are pledged or obligations of any other state or political subdivision or instrumentality thereof; provided, that approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee is first obtained.

The bank or trust company holding the proceeds of such general obligation refunding bonds in escrow shall deliver to the local government official designated by law as custodian of local government funds, a copy of the document evidencing each transaction relating to the escrow fund, or a report thereof, as each transaction occurs. On or before August 1 of each year, a report of the financial condition of the escrow fund as of June 30 of that year, and an operating statement for the escrow fund for the year ending June 30 of such year, shall be delivered to the custodian. However, at the discretion of the escrow agent, the report of the financial condition of the escrow fund may be made on a more frequent basis. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in escrow for the retirement of obligations being refunded but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable or, if presently redeemable, shall not have been called for redemption.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-14; 2001, ch. 253, § 11; 2010, ch. 868, § 68.

9-21-915. Powers to secure and to covenant as to general obligation refunding bonds.

In order to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on general obligation refunding bonds issued pursuant to this part and part 1 of this chapter, or in connection with such bonds, any local government shall have the power as to such bonds to:

Pledge the full faith, credit and unlimited taxing power of the local government as to all taxable property in the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds;

Pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, or other charges received or receivable by the local government from any public works project or projects then existing or thereafter to be constructed, including any revenues derived or to be derived by a local government from a lease, agreement or contract with any other local government, local government instrumentality, the state, or a state or federal agency for the use of or in connection with such public works project or projects, to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds issued to finance such public works project or projects or any other public works project or projects, and to covenant against thereafter pledging any such fees, rents, tolls, or charges to any other bonds or any other obligations of the local government;

Provide for the terms, forms, registration, exchange, execution and authentication of the general obligation refunding bonds in a manner not inconsistent with this part and part 1 of this chapter;

Covenant as to the use and disposition of the proceeds from the sale of the general obligation refunding bonds in a manner not inconsistent with this part and part 1 of this chapter;

Covenant as to the fees, rents or tolls to be charged in connection with any public works project or projects, covenant that provisions will be made for the retirement of the outstanding obligations from the proceeds of the general obligation refunding bonds being issued, and covenant as to any other use and disposition to be made of the proceeds thereof, and enter into appropriate agreements with any other local government, local government instrumentality, the state, or a state or federal agency for such purpose with respect to a public works project which is owned or leased by a local government or local government instrumentality;

Covenant as to the operation and maintenance of the public works project;

Covenant to set aside or pay over reserves and sinking funds for the general obligation refunding bonds and as to the disposition thereof;

Redeem the general obligation refunding bonds, and covenant for their redemption and provide the terms and conditions thereof;

Covenant as to its books of account, as to the inspection and audit thereof and as to the accounting methods; provided, that an audit of the books and accounts of the local government shall be made at least annually in accordance with §§ 4-3-304 and 6-56-105. All audits shall be performed in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury;

Covenant and prescribe as to what occurrences shall constitute “events of default” and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the general obligation refunding bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

Covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition or obligation;

Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers herein granted or in the performance of its covenants or duties;

Make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure the general obligation refunding bonds, or in the discretion of the governing body, make the general obligation refunding bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein; it being the purpose hereof to give the local government power to do all things in the issuance of the general obligation refunding bonds and for their security that may be consistent with the Constitution of Tennessee;

Pledge all or any part of the then unpledged rates, fees, rents or other charges to be received from its waterworks system to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on any sewer bonds for the acquisition or construction of facilities for the collection, treatment and disposal of sewage and waste matter, including all property, real and personal, appurtenant thereto or in connection therewith, which pledge may be in addition to a pledge of the taxing power and in addition to a pledge of rates, fees, rents and charges received or receivable from a sewer system then existing or to be constructed;

Covenant that it will fix, levy and collect fees, rents, tolls or other charges for the privilege of parking motor vehicles in the space immediately adjacent to any parking meter which, in its discretion, it may install and operate and maintain beside specified portions of the public streets;

Covenant that the costs of operation and maintaining parking facilities payable, in part from the revenues of such parking facilities, shall not include all or any part of the salaries of police officers employed in the enforcement of on-street parking regulations; and

Covenant and provide for the discharge and satisfaction and defeasance of all or any part of general obligation refunding bonds and the indebtedness evidenced thereby.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-15.

9-21-916. Remedies of general obligation refunding bondholders.

Any holder of general obligation refunding bonds issued pursuant to this part and part 1 of this chapter shall have all rights provided in §9-21-216, in addition to all other rights provided by law.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 9-16.